Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201550-430
Intergenerational Poverty Task Force; duties.

The Intergenerational Poverty Task Force shall, with respect to programs, including, but not limited to, the aid to dependent children program described in section 43-513, the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program established pursuant to 7 U.S.C. 2011 et seq., as such sections existed on January 1, 2015, the child care assistance program described in section 68-1206, and the Employment First program developed pursuant to the self-sufficiency contract described in sections 68-1719 to 68-1724 and rules and regulations of the Department of Health and Human Services:

(1) Share, examine, and analyze data and information regarding intergenerational poverty in the state with a primary focus on data and information regarding children who are at risk of continuing the cycle of poverty unless outside intervention is made and develop effective and efficient plans, programs, and recommendations to help such children escape the cycle of poverty;

(2) Encourage participation and input from academic experts, advocacy groups, nonprofit corporations, local governments, and faith-based institutions in exploring strategies and solutions to help children who are victims of intergenerational poverty escape the cycle of poverty;

(3) Study, evaluate, and report on the status and effectiveness of policies, procedures, and programs implemented by other states and by nongovernmental entities that address the needs of and that provide services to children affected by intergenerational poverty;

(4) Identify policies, procedures, and programs, including any lack of interagency data sharing, lack of policy coordination, or current federal requirements, that are impeding efforts to help children in the state affected by intergenerational poverty escape the cycle of poverty and recommend changes to those policies and procedures;

(5) Create a long-range strategic plan containing:

(a) Measurable goals and benchmarks, including future action needed to attain those goals and benchmarks, for decreasing the incidence of intergenerational poverty among the state's children and increasing the number of the state's children who escape the cycle of poverty; and

(b) Recommended data-supported changes to policies, procedures, and programs to address the needs of children affected by intergenerational poverty and to help those children escape the cycle of poverty, including the steps that will be required to make the recommended changes and whether further action is required by the Legislature or the federal government; and

(6) Protect the privacy of individuals living in poverty by using and distributing the data it collects or examines in compliance with federal requirements and with sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.

Laws 2015, LB607, § 5.
May 28, 2015